Utah statutes.
70A-2-202.   Final written expression -- Parol or extrinsic evidence.

Terms with respect to which the confirmatory memoranda of the parties agree or which are otherwise set forth in a writing intended by the parties as a final expression of their agreement with respect to such terms as are included therein may not be contradicted by evidence of any prior agreement or of a contemporaneous oral agreement but may be explained or supplemented:

(1)  by course of performance, course of dealing, or usage of trade (Section 70A-1a-303) or by course of performance (Section 70A-2-208); and

(2)  by evidence of consistent additional terms unless the court finds the writing to have been intended also as a complete and exclusive statement of the terms of the agreement.

